Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. In General

§ 11-34-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“First mortgage” means first and superior liens on farm lands except as hereinafter provided, the fee simple title to which is in the proposed borrower;

“Farm land,” “farm” and “farms” includes:

Lands used principally for raising agricultural products;

Lands used principally for dairying purposes; and

Lands or ranches used principally for livestock purposes.

“Board” means the state loan and investment board;

“This act” means W.S.

11-34-101

through

11-34-203

.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 41-101; C.S. 1945, § 21-101; W.S. 1957, § 11-609; W.S. 1977, §

11-39-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1982, ch. 25, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2011, ch. 109, § 2; 2019 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iv), substituted “11-34-306” for “11-34-305.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(iv), substituted “11-34-203” for “11-34-306.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-34-102.
Rural credits; establishment and administration; composition of board;
power to sue and be sued; officers.

For the purpose of fostering and encouraging agriculture, dairying and livestock raising in Wyoming and the development and improvement of farm lands, there is hereby created and established a system of rural credits to be administered by the state loan and investment board.

The board of land commissioners is hereby constituted the state loan and investment board. The board may sue and be sued in the name of the state loan and investment board in the courts of this state and in no other jurisdiction on any mortgage, contract of sale or lease issued by the board. The governor is president of the board but in his absence from any meeting one (1) of the members may act as president pro tempore and preside at meetings. The director of the office of state lands and investments is the chief executive officer of the board, and the deputy director of the office of state lands and investments is deputy chief executive officer.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 2; 1929, ch. 92, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 41-102; C.S. 1945, § 21-102; W.S. 1957, § 11-610; W.S. 1977, §

11-39-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 195, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to board of land commissioners, see §§

36-2-101

to

36-2-210

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 11-34-103.
Powers and duties generally; employees and financial matters; reports
to governor.

The board shall establish a system of farm loans, and foreclose or renew any installment payment of the loans as provided by this act. The board may provide for its office, necessary furniture, fixtures, stationery and supplies, adopt rules and regulations proper and necessary for the conduct of its business and receive and approve applications for farm loans. All monies received shall be delivered to the state treasurer to be credited to the funds from which originally drawn. The board may acquire and dispose of property, real and personal, as necessary or convenient for the transaction of its business and accept assignments of interests in any real or personal property which are taken as additional security or collateral to preexistent debts or approved loans.

The board shall employ assistants, clerks, appraisers and other employees as necessary to conduct its business, fix the fees, costs and charges which shall be credited to the general fund to cover the expenses of the board in making loans and define the duties of the officers, agents and employees of the board. All officers and employees shall be under the direction and authority of the board in all matters not inconsistent with this act. The board shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor such general information and recommendations as to the board seem proper. The board shall exercise all incidental power as necessary to carry out this act.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 3; 1925, ch. 86, § 1; 1929, ch. 92, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 41-103; Laws 1933, ch. 82, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-103; W.S. 1957, § 11-611; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-39-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-104.
Seal; design.

The board shall obtain
and keep a seal. The design of the seal shall be a circle within which
appears in the center the word “Seal.” Between the lower and upper
edges of the circle, properly divided, shall appear the words “Wyoming
State Loan and Investment Board,” “State of Wyoming.”

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 41-105; C.S. 1945, § 21-105; W.S. 1957, § 11-613; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-105; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 11-34-105.
Chief executive officer; powers and duties.

The director of the office of state lands and investments is the chief executive officer under the direction of the board and has general supervision of the business and employees of the board.

The director of the office of state lands and investments shall:

Keep all books of account of the board;

Receive, collect and promptly pay over to the state treasurer all monies that come into his possession;

Keep in his care and custody copies of all promissory notes, mortgages and other securities or evidences of indebtedness and muniments of title acquired or received by the board for monies loaned on real estate;

Transmit to the state treasurer the original notes and mortgages at the time of the disbursements of monies by the state treasurer. The security shall be kept by the state treasurer as a record and evidence of monies disbursed by the treasurer by virtue of this act;

Render monthly statements to the board of the transactions of his office;

Keep the seal of the board and affix the seal with his attestation to all instruments or papers whenever required;

Keep a record of the proceedings of the board and such books and records as are necessary for the conduct of the business of his office including a written record of all votes taken to decide the board’s final action on any matter;

Submit regular reports to the board setting forth in detail the status of all farm and water development project loans which are delinquent as to the payment of any installment of principal or interest due; and

Do and perform such other acts as required by the board.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, §§ 4, 6, 7; 1925, ch. 86, § 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 41-104, 41-106, 41-107; C.S. 1945, §§ 21-104, 21-106, 21-107; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-612, 11-614, 11-615; W.S. 1977, §§

11-39-104

, 11-39-106, 11-39-107; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2013 ch. 184, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), inserted present (viii), redesignated former (viii) as (ix); and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “including a written record of all votes taken to decide the board’s final action on any matter” in (b)(vii).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “water development project” for “irrigation” in (b)(viii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-106.
Legal advisor.

The attorney general
is the legal advisor of the board and its officers.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 41-123; C.S. 1945, § 21-123; W.S. 1957, § 11-616; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-34-107.
Quorum; loan; votes required; record.

A majority of the board
constitutes a quorum. No loan shall be made except upon the affirmative
vote of not less than three (3) of the members, and the records of
the meeting shall show which members voted to approve the loan.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 41-113; Laws 1941, ch. 100, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 21-113; W.S. 1957, § 11-617; Laws 1965, ch. 143, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-34-108.
Loans on lands subject to preexisting liens; effect.

The board may loan money
on and take as security farm lands subject to liens, charges or assessments
for drainage, reclamation or irrigation purposes, payable in installments,
not due at the time of making the loan, and the mortgage taken to
secure the loan shall, notwithstanding the liens, charges or assessments,
be deemed a first mortgage within the meaning of this act. The amount
of the liens, charges or assessments shall be considered by the board
in determining the amount to be loaned on the farm lands.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 10; 1923, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 41-110; C.S. 1945, § 21-110; W.S. 1957, § 11-618; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-110; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-109.
Purposes
for which loans authorized.

Loans may be made for the following agriculture related purposes and no other:

To provide for the purchase of farm lands;

To provide for the purchase of equipment as defined by the board, fertilizers and livestock necessary for the proper and reasonable operation of the mortgaged farm lands;

To provide for buildings and other improvements, as defined by the board, of farm lands;

To liquidate indebtedness of the owner of the land to be mortgaged;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 42, § 2.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 11; 1929, ch. 92, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 41-111; Laws 1933, ch. 109, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-111; W.S. 1957, § 11-619; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1; 2003, ch. 200, § 1; 2008, ch. 42, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, repealed former (a)(v) which read: “To provide for the purchase of replacement breeding stock pursuant to W.S. 11-34-113(h).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-34-110.
Limitations on borrowers; due on sale clause; sale of mortgaged land.

No loan shall be made to any person who is not at the time or shortly to become engaged in the cultivation and development of the farm land mortgaged.

Loans shall be made only to qualified Wyoming electors or to a corporation if a majority of the corporation’s outstanding shares are owned beneficially or of record by qualified Wyoming electors.

Every mortgage shall contain a due on sale clause which may be exercised at the option of the board. The board may permit a mortgage to be assumed by a purchaser who is otherwise qualified to receive a loan under this act, or by the heirs of a deceased mortgagor.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 41-115; C.S. 1945, § 21-115; W.S. 1957, § 11-620; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-111.
Application for loan; form; contents; priority of applications.

Every applicant for a loan under this act shall apply on a form prescribed by the board. The applicant shall state the object to which the proceeds of the loan will be applied and shall furnish such other information as required by the board.

The state loan and investment board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to establish criteria for determining the priority in which farm loan applications will be considered. The criteria for establishing priority will include, but are not limited to, an applicant’s need, financial net worth, earning capacity and the ability to repay the loan.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 41-117; C.S. 1945, § 21-117; W.S. 1957, § 11-621; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-113; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-112.
Application for loan; filing; appraisal of land; consideration of
written report.

Before any mortgage loan
is made by the board, the loan application shall be filed with the
director of the office of state lands and investments who shall make,
or cause to be made, an appraisal and written report upon the land
offered as security for the loan. No loan shall be made unless the
written report is filed with the director of the office of state lands
and investments and considered, approved and authorized by the unanimous
consent of all members of the board present at the meeting at which
the loan is considered.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 41-108; C.S. 1945, § 21-108; W.S. 1957, § 11-622; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-114; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to director of sales land and investment board, see §

11-34-105

.

As to need for three affirmative votes for loan, see §

11-34-107

.

§ 11-34-113.
Terms and conditions of loans.

The board shall make loans only upon the following terms and conditions:

The loan shall be secured by a duly recorded first or second mortgage as approved by the board on the farm lands within this state;

Every mortgage shall contain an agreement providing for repayment of the entire amount of the loan and interest upon a certain date or in several specified payments, or on an amortization plan of annual or semiannual installments so computed as to pay the interest on the loan according to terms of the mortgage and such amounts to be applied on the principal as will terminate the debt within an agreed period of not less than five (5) years nor more than thirty (30) years. The method of repayment is at the option of the board.

After five (5) years from date of the mortgage, additional payments for part or all of the principal may be made on the annual or semiannual payment date under such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe. On the application of the borrower the board may provide in the mortgage for the payment of interest only during the first five (5) years and thereafter for the payment of both interest and principal on the amortization plan. Any loan may be paid in full before the expiration of five (5) years upon payment of a ten dollar ($10.00) fee to be paid into the general fund. Any loan paid in full after five (5) years from the date thereof, the ten dollars ($10.00) fee shall not be collected.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 242, § 2.

Notwithstanding the loan term limitation specified in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, the board may reamortize farm loan payments over an additional number of years which together with the years remaining on the original term shall create a new term not to exceed thirty (30) years, at the same interest rate as that in effect at the time of reamortization for loans being made under W.S.

11-34-101

through

11-34-130

, when in the judgment of the board the reduced payments resulting from reamortization of the loan will provide adequate financial benefit to assure with reasonable certainty the ultimate repayment of the loan. Any borrower requesting reamortization shall have the burden of showing that reamortization will significantly improve the financial viability of the agricultural operation. No loan shall be reamortized if, in the sole judgment of the board, the borrower is in sound financial condition and reamortization is not necessary to secure repayment of the loan, or if reamortization will not provide sufficient financial benefit to avoid the imminent failure of the borrower’s operation. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the reamortization of water development project loans.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 242, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 42, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 35, § 2.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 9; 1929, ch. 92, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 41-109; Laws 1935, ch. 119, § 3; 1937, ch. 52, § 3; 1945, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-109; W.S. 1957, § 11-623; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-115; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 20, § 1; 1982, ch. 26, § 1; 1985, ch. 189, § 1; 1987, ch. 242, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 200, § 1; 2008, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2; 2016 ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, repealed former (h) pertaining to the drought assistance for breeding livestock; and added (j).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “water development project” for “irrigation” in (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (j), which read: “(j) Notwithstanding the terms and conditions specified in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, the board may make loans for the purpose of enhancing or restoring livestock numbers in the state.
Loans made under this subsection shall be for a term not to exceed seven (7) years.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect as to interest due of real estate mortgage clause authorizing mortgagor to prepay principal debt, 86 ALR3d 599.

§ 11-34-114.
Limitation on loans; percentages of appraised value.

No loan secured by a first mortgage shall exceed seventy percent (70%) of the appraised value of the land with the necessary existing improvements, as ascertained and fixed by the board except as provided by W.S.

11-34-117

. If a loan is secured by a second mortgage, the sum of the first and second mortgages shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the appraised value of the land and improvements and the balance due on the loans secured by the first or second mortgage shall not exceed eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00). The appraisal shall be made by the state loan and investment board, with the advice of two (2) residents of the immediate locality in which the loan is being considered.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 42, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 35, § 2.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 12; 1923, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3; 1929, ch. 92, § 5; 1931, ch. 42, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 41-112; Laws 1941, ch. 100, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-112; Laws 1951, ch. 37, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-624; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 20, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1; 1984, ch. 30, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 98, § 1; 2003, ch. 200, § 1; 2008, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), deleted “and subsection (b) of this section” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00)” for “six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000.00)”; repealed former (b) pertaining to increasing loan limits, modifying loan terms and conditions; and added (c).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (c), which read: “(c) No loan made pursuant to W.S. 11 34 113(j) shall exceed seventy percent (70%) of the appraised value of the security.
Loans may be secured by a first or second mortgage on the borrower's real estate as approved by the board and shall be aggregated with all other loans for purposes of determining compliance with the loan percentages specified in subsection (a) of this section.”

§ 11-34-115.
Minimum and maximum amount of loans.

The amount of loans to any one (1) borrower shall not be less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) if all loans to the borrower are made for the purposes of purchasing farm lands or other purposes as defined by W.S. 11-34-109(a)(i) through (iv).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 16; 1923, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 41-116; C.S. 1945, § 21-116; Laws 1951, ch. 28, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-625; Laws 1971, ch. 17, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-117; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 20, § 1; 1984, ch. 30, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 98, § 1; 2003, ch. 200, § 1; 2008, ch. 42, § 1; 2017 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00),” substituted “eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00)” for “six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000.00),” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “In addition, a qualified borrower may borrow not more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) pursuant to W.S. 11 34 113(h).”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00).

§ 11-34-116.
Agreement to use loans for purposes specified; reappraisement and
additional loan.

Every borrower who is granted a loan under this act shall enter into an agreement with the board that if the whole or any portion of his loan is expended for purposes other than those specified in his original application, or if the borrower is in default in respect to any condition or covenant of the mortgage, or in case the mortgagor, his heirs or assigns abandon the land for one (1) year, or if the board at any time believes that the loan is not adequately secured by reason of any mismanagement, waste or neglect of the land, the loan at the option of the board shall become due and payable forthwith. The board may permit the loan to be used for any purpose specified in W.S.

11-34-109

.

A reappraisement may be permitted at any time by the board and an additional loan may be granted as the reappraisal may warrant.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, §§ 14, 19; R.S. 1931, §§ 41-114, 41-119; C.S. 1945, §§ 21-114, 21-119; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-626, 11-627; W.S. 1977, §§ 11-39-118; 11-39-119; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-34-117.
Rates of interest; length of loan; amount.

The board may set rates of interest on all farm loans according to current interest rates but not less than four percent (4%) nor more than ten percent (10%) whether the money is loaned upon the amortization plan or otherwise.

A farm loan to a beginning agriculture producer shall be the lowest of eight per cent (8%) or the yield on a ten (10) year United States treasury bond. This loan rate shall be fixed for a period of ten (10) years. At the end of the ten (10) year period the interest rate shall be the current rate for loans as established under subsection (a) of this section.

The total value of loans outstanding pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total amount of farm loan investment authorized by W.S.

11-34-129

.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 35, § 2.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 25; 1923, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 41-125; Laws 1939, ch. 23, § 2; 1943, ch. 16, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 21-125; W.S. 1957, § 11-628; Laws 1961, ch. 153, § 1; 1969, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-120; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 158, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 98, § 1; 2003, ch. 200, § 1; 2008, ch. 42, § 1; 2017 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 35, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to rate of interest generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “11-34-113(j)” for “11-34-113(h)” in (a) and (d); substituted “equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the lowest current rate set by the board for farm loans other than loans under W.S. 11-34-113(j)” for “matching the overall market return rate earned during the prior fiscal year by the state treasurer on investable funds, excluding legislatively designated investments. If the borrower qualifies, at the end of the five (5) year period, the unpaid balance may be converted to a standard farm loan at the board approved interest rate for such loans at the time of the conversion” at the end of (a); substituted “ten percent (10%) of the total amount of farm loan investment authorized by W.S.

11-34-129

” for “seven million dollars ($7,000,000.00)” in (c); and in (d), substituted “twenty percent (20%) of the total amount of farm loan investment authorized by W.S.

11-34-129

” for “fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00),” and substituted “three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00)” for “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00).”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “twenty percent (20%)” for “ten percent (10%).”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, deleted “except that loans pursuant to W.S. 11-34-113(j) shall be loaned for a fixed period of up to seven (7) years with a set interest rate equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the lowest current rate set by the board for farm loans other than loans under W.S. 11-34-113(j)” at the end of (a).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (d), which read: “(d) The total value of loans outstanding pursuant to W.S. 11-34-113(j) shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total amount of farm loan investment authorized by W.S.

11-34-129

. The amount loaned to any one (1) borrower shall not be more than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00).”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect as to interest due of real estate mortgage clause authorizing mortgagor to prepay principal debt, 86 ALR3d 599.

§ 11-34-118.
Refinancing delinquent loans; payment of costs; additional fee.

The board, whenever it
deems necessary for the better protection of permanent funds of the
state invested in farm loans, may refinance any delinquent farm mortgage
loan and reamortize the loan over not more than thirty (30) years
from the date of refinancing. All costs of refinancing the loan, including
the cost of having the abstract brought down to date, shall be paid
by the mortgagor and no loan shall be refinanced where it appears
refinancing will jeopardize the collection of the loan. An additional
fee of one percent (1%) of the amount of the reamortized loan shall
be paid by each mortgagor to the board to be credited to the loss
reserve account as provided by W.S. 11-34-202(e).

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 89, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-130; W.S. 1957, § 11-629; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-121; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 84, § 1.

§ 11-34-119.
Ultra vires acts of agent.

No loan or mortgage securing
the loan shall be impaired or invalidated by any act of any agent
of the board in excess of his powers.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 20; R.S. 1931, § 41-120; C.S. 1945, § 21-120; W.S. 1957, § 11-630; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-122; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-34-120.
Mortgages taken by board; control and disposition of property.

All mortgages and accompanying promissory note or notes taken by the board for monies loaned shall run to state loan and investment board as mortgagee or payee, and all titles to property taken by the board shall run to the board as grantee. The board may control, manage, lease and dispose of the property, subject to the following:

The board may lease any or all property for oil and gas for a primary term up to ten (10) years and as long thereafter as oil or gas is produced in paying quantities and extend the term of existing oil and gas leases in good standing for as long as oil or gas is produced in paying quantities and for coal and other mineral purposes for terms not exceeding ten (10) years, with the preferential right in each coal or other mineral lessee to renew the lease for successive periods of ten (10) years each;

The board may make and establish rules and regulations governing the issuance of mineral leases and covering the conduct of development and mining operations to be carried on thereunder;

Mineral leases may be issued upon monthly or annual minimum rental payment basis as fixed by the board, with payments annually applied against any royalty as shall accrue for the same lease year by the terms of the lease, which royalty, as to lands leased for oil or gas shall not be less than five percent (5%) of all oil and gas produced and saved from and not used in operations on the lands under the lease, and royalty of not less than five cents ($.05) per ton on coal produced from the lands under any lease for coal purposes, the royalty to be paid on mine run of coal.

No mineral lease is assignable or transferable except with written consent of the board. It shall require the lessee’s full compliance with all rules and regulations adopted by the board and compliance with all terms of the lease. All mineral leases shall be separate and distinct from each lease of the land for grazing or agricultural purposes. Rules and regulations adopted by the board shall provide for joint use of the lands for grazing and agricultural or mineral purposes without undue interference by the lessees under any class of leases with lessees under any other class. The board, on behalf of the state and its lessee in any mineral lease may join in the interest of conservation and greater ultimate recovery of oil and gas, in fair and equitable cooperative or unit plans of development or operation of oil and gas pools, with the United States government and its lessees or permittees, or others, and the board may modify and change any terms and conditions of any oil and gas lease as mutually agreed by the lessor and lessee to conform to the terms of any lease to the cooperative or unit plan and to effectuate proper operations thereunder. The changes may include extension of the term of years applicable to any lease for the full period of time during which the cooperative or unit plan may remain in effect.

When a cooperative or unit agreement is terminated or ceases to be effective as to lands upon which there is no production of oil or gas, the lease covering the lands shall remain in effect for two (2) years from the date the lands ceased to be subject to the agreement, or for the remaining length of the term of the original lease, whichever is greater, and so long thereafter as oil or gas is produced from the lands in accordance with the requirements of the original lease.

The terms of any lease issued under this section for land on which actual drilling operations were commenced prior to the end of its primary term and are being diligently prosecuted at that time shall be extended for one (1) year and so long thereafter as oil or gas is produced in paying quantities.

If land acquired by the board and upon which improvements for mineral operations and other improvements have been made, are sold as to both surface and mineral rights, or if the lands are leased for minerals to other than the owner of the mineral improvements, the purchaser or new lessee shall pay the owner of the improvements the fair value thereof at a mutually agreed price. If agreement cannot be promptly reached the price shall be fixed by appraisement under the direction of the board. As used in this subsection “improvements” means improvements which are used or useful and necessary for subsequent operation of the land for mineral purposes and the price shall include the fair value of the work previously done in the development of the property if it is of practical use in future mineral operation. No well drilled on the land for oil or gas which does not produce either in commercial quantities, and no shaft, tunnel or drift from which coal or other minerals have been substantially exhausted shall be considered improvements for the purposes of this subsection.

The board may sell or otherwise dispose of property at a price not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the appraised value and upon terms determined by the board which shall adopt rules and regulations governing such sales. When land is sold which was acquired by the board through the foreclosure of any farm loan mortgage provided for by this act, the board shall not reserve any part of, or interest in, the mineral estate. When land otherwise acquired by the board is sold, the board may reserve all or any part of the mineral content of the land and the right to use so much of the surface of the land as it considers convenient or necessary in connection with mineral operations thereon, together with all needed rights of ingress and egress, but the board in each case shall appropriately provide for indemnification of the surface owner against all surface damages caused by mineral operations on the land.

The board may lease for agricultural and grazing purposes any lands acquired by it on such terms and conditions as it prescribes and adopt rules and regulations it considers necessary in facilitating the leases.

Revenue received by the board under this section from agricultural, grazing and mineral leases of lands acquired by foreclosure shall be credited to the loss reserve account as provided by W.S. 11-34-202(e).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 22; 1929, ch. 92, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 41-122; Laws 1945, ch. 143, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-122; Laws 1951, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-631; Laws 1965, ch. 194, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-123; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 55, § 1; ch. 84, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-34-101(a)(iv).

Cited

in

In re Hagood, 356 P.2d 135,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 11-34-121.
Mortgagor to pay for recording loan papers; title insurance or abstract
required; deposit; additional fee.

The mortgagor shall pay
for the recording of his mortgage and other papers connected with
the loan which may be required. He shall furnish to the board at his
own expense a mortgagee’s title insurance policy in the full amount
of the mortgage, issued by a title insurance company authorized to
do business in Wyoming in a form acceptable to the board, reflecting
merchantable fee title in mortgagor, or in lieu thereof an abstract
of title certified by a bonded abstracter qualified to prepare abstracts
under the laws of Wyoming, under such rules as the board may prescribe.
The mortgagor shall deposit with the board before his application
is considered, one hundred dollars ($100.00), the unused portion of
which, if his loan is not granted, shall be returned to him, but if
his loan is granted, the amount shall be paid into the loss reserve
account as provided by W.S. 11-34-202(e). An additional fee of one percent (1%) of the loan closed
shall be paid by each mortgagor to the board. The revenues produced
by this fee shall be credited to the loss reserve account as provided
by W.S. 11-34-202(e).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 24; 1925, ch. 86, § 3; 1929, ch. 92, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 41-124; C.S. 1945, § 21-124; W.S. 1957, § 11-632; Laws 1967, ch. 159, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-124; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 84, § 1.

§ 11-34-122.
Release of mortgage.

When the mortgagor or
his successor in interest has fully paid any mortgage, the board shall
furnish him with a proper release of the mortgage executed by the
president of the board and attested by the director of the office
of state lands and investments with the seal of the board thereon,
and the mortgage papers belonging to the loan including abstract of
title and insurance policies assigned, shall be returned to the mortgagor
or successor in interest.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 41-121; C.S. 1945, § 21-121; W.S. 1957, § 11-633; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-125; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the director of the state loan and investment board, see §

11-34-105

.

§ 11-34-123.
Foreclosure
proceedings; duty of attorney general; deed in lieu of foreclosure.

Any foreclosure of any mortgage provided for by this act shall be made in the usual manner, either by civil action or by advertisement as the board may direct. In cases of foreclosure the attorney general shall render all services needed in connection with the foreclosure proceedings, and the costs, fees and expenses may be taxed in like manner and to the same effect as if the state of Wyoming were a natural person. Payment of proceeds upon foreclosure shall be made in accordance with W.S.

34-4-113

. All monies received by the state from sale of the land acquired by foreclosure or by redemption of land sold on foreclosure, in excess of the amount owing to the appropriate permanent fund account and the interest due thereon, shall be credited to the loss reserve account as provided by W.S. 11-34-202(e). The board may extend the time of payment of any interest or installment payment due on any farm loan for as long as the board deems proper, and distribute the defaulted payments including interest, over undue payments in a manner and under terms the board deems just, each loan to be judged on its own merits without regard to any general rule. It is the intention of this section to authorize the board to consider and determine whether any mortgages executed by virtue of this act shall be foreclosed or renewed, with or without penalty, but no renewal shall extend beyond the due date of the original loan or any extension of the term by reamortization authorized by W.S. 11-34-113(d).

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section the state loan and investment board by unanimous vote may accept a deed in lieu of foreclosure, provided:

The board determines any remaining liability is not collectible; and

Any loss to any permanent fund resulting from the acceptance of the deed in lieu of foreclosure is restored as provided by W.S. 11-34-202(f).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 118, § 28; 1925, ch. 86, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 41-128; Laws 1933, ch. 82, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 21-129; W.S. 1957, § 11-634; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-126; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1985, ch. 189, § 1; 1986, ch. 84, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 228, § 2; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

Cross references. —

As to redemption of realty sold under mortgage or execution, see §§

1-18-101

and

1-18-112

.

As to foreclosure of real estate mortgages by advertisement and sale, see §§

34-4-101

to

34-4-113

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, in (a), inserted third sentence, and made stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 11-34-202(f)” for “W.S.

9-4-703

” in (c)(ii).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (b), which read: “For the period beginning March 1, 1985, and ending July 1, 1986, no foreclosure proceedings shall be commenced against any person who is in default on any agricultural loan made by the state of Wyoming under W.S.

11-34-101

through

11-34-202

unless the foreclosure has been approved by the state loan and investment board after the borrower has been given notice of the proposed foreclosure by certified mail and has been afforded the opportunity of a meeting with the state loan and investment board.”